Washington statutes.
RCW 35.61.090

Elections—Laws governing.

The manner of holding any general or special election in a metropolitan park district shall be in accordance with the general election laws of this state insofar as they are not inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter.

[ 1985 c 416 s 3; 1965 c 7 s 35.61.090. Prior: 1943 c 264 s 3, part; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 6741-3, part; prior: 1909 c 131 s 2; 1907 c 98 s 3, part; RRS s 6722, part.]

NOTES:

Elections: Title 29A RCW.